Washington statutes.
RCW 9.51.040

Grand juror acting after challenge allowed.

Every grand juror who, with knowledge that a challenge interposed against him or her by a defendant has been allowed, shall be present at, or take part, or attempt to take part, in the consideration of the charge against the defendant who interposed such challenge, or the deliberations of the grand jury thereon, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 309; 1909 c 249 s 121; RRS s 2373.]